Arkansas, session 2025, HB1716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-18-401, concerning the assessment and
collection of taxes by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(c)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (c)(3) of this section, if
a taxpayer has previously appealed an assessment of gross receipts or
compensating use tax under § 26-18-403 or the denial of a claimed refund of
gross receipts or compensating use tax under § 26-18-507, the secretary shall
not subsequently assess gross receipts or compensating use tax against the
taxpayer on the sale or purchase of the same item of tangible personal
property if the taxpayer has received a decision that the sale or purchase
*JLL287*
03/10/2025 12:32:40 PM JLL287

HB1716
qualified for an exemption under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, §
26-52-101 et seq. or the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101
et seq. by:
(A) The Office of Hearings and Appeals under § 26-18-405
that is not pending judicial review or overturned upon judicial review;
(B) The Tax Appeals Commission under § 26-18-1116 that is
not pending judicial review or overturned upon judicial review;
(C) A circuit court under § 26-18-406 that is not pending
appeal to the Supreme Court or overturned by the Supreme Court; or
(D) The Supreme Court.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) of this section applies only to gross
receipts or compensating use tax on the sale or purchase of tangible personal
property by the same taxpayer when the taxpayer is using the tangible
personal property in the same way that was previously determined to be exempt
by the office, commission, circuit court, or Supreme Court.
(3) The prohibition against the assessment of gross receipts or
compensating use tax by the secretary under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section does not apply when there is a material change in law regarding the
qualifications for the exemption that formed the basis of the decision in the
taxpayer’s favor under subdivision (c)(1) of this section by:
(A) A new enactment of law by the General Assembly;
(B) An amendment or repeal of the law by the General
Assembly;
(C) A newly promulgated rule or a change in a promulgated
rule approved by the Legislative Council under § 10-3-309; or
(D) A subsequent decision of the Supreme Court.










03/10/2025 12:32:40 PM JLL287